Louisiana, session 2026, HB923.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:4, 61, 62, 63, 64.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (2) and
(B)(introductory paragraph) and (1), 76(C)(4)(f) and (i), 382, 384(A), 385(B), 390(C), 1123,
1178(A)(introductory paragraph), (B), and (E), 1310.3(A), 1372, 1378(A)(2)(c) and (E),
Page 1 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
1538(A)(1), 1541(A), (E), and (F)(1), 1541.1(A) and (B), 1593, 1595(B)(1) and (C), 1599,
1601(8)(a) and (b), 1624, 1625, 1626(B) and (C), 1627, 1629(A), 1630, 1714(A), 1749.2(A),
and 2051(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 23:1.1 is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
TITLE 23
LABOR AND WORKER'S WORKERS' COMPENSATION
CHAPTER 1. LOUISIANA WORKS
PART I. ESTABLISHMENT, POWERS, AND DUTIES
* * *
§1.1 Integrated case management; service integration of various workforce and
social service programs
A. The legislature recognizes that the department provides services to
support individuals with various needs and in various stages of life. However, the
conventional service delivery system of requiring individuals to access various
offices within the state and even within the department to address those multiple
needs creates barriers for the delivery of those services and entry into the workforce.
These needs can be better met, more efficiently and less costly, through integrated
case management at a single service location with a single case worker, even when
those services may be provided by multiple state agencies. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a comprehensive, streamlined social services and workforce
delivery system that incorporates integrated case management models for customers
and their families served by multiple departments and programs.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
(1) "Integrated case management" means an accessible, customer-centered
approach that coordinates the necessary services that meet the needs of each
individual or family which, if applicable, establishes a comprehensive, integrated
service plan that addresses all of those needs and outcomes, which is continually
monitored and updated as necessary.
Page 2 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(2) "Integrated service plan" means a plan that is based on the customer's
strengths, risks, service needs, and improvement plan.
(3) "Service integration" means a process by which a range of social,
education, and workforce employment and training services are delivered in a
coordinated and seamless manner to provide customer-oriented services, increase
early intervention and prevention opportunities, improve outcomes, and establish
provider accountability through performance measures. Service integration includes:
(a) A "One Door" business model which makes it easier for the customer to
obtain services and allows various programs to work seamlessly together across
multiple agencies.
(b) Cross-training among the various program staff across multiple
governmental, nonprofit, and private sector agencies and organizations to ensure a
general understanding of all programs through which a comprehensive plan may be
developed for a customer to access.
(c) Flexible use of funding among the federal and state programs and, if
applicable, departments, agencies, and community programs, comprising a multi-
disciplinary team to ensure that the customer receives services for which he is
eligible.
* * *
§4. Divisions of the commission department
In addition to divisions, bureaus, boards, and commissions established within
the commission department by law, the secretary, with the approval of the governor,
may establish any division or bureau deemed advisable for the administration or
enforcement of any law with which he is charged. The secretary may combine or
consolidate the activities of two or more divisions or bureaus of the commission
department, or provide for the establishment of any other when such action is
deemed advisable for the more efficient and economical administration of the work
and duties of the commission department.
* * *
Page 3 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
§61. Purpose
The provisions of this Part are intended to maximize community participation
in the administration and implementation of programs designed to develop
employment opportunities for individuals with low income and to ameliorate the
impact of such income level on their physical and mental well-being provide
assistance to local communities by working through a network of community action
agencies to support employment in order to reduce poverty, revitalize low-income
communities, and stabilize low-income families and individuals in rural and urban
areas to become fully self-sufficient. To accomplish this purpose, the legislature
enacts this Part for the purpose of establishing a procedure for the designation of
community action agencies; fixing the responsibilities of community action agencies;
defining community action programs; and establishing a formula for the allocation
of community service block grant funds.
§62. Definitions
As used in this Part:
(1) "Community action agency" means a public agency or private nonprofit
corporation designated by Louisiana Works having authority under its charter or
bylaws, or both, to administer community action programs, which has been
designated as a community action agency by the parish governing authority anti-
poverty, workforce, and family-support services pursuant to federal and state law.
(2) "Community action program" means a community-based and operated
program which provides services, assistance, and other activities of sufficient scope
and size to give promise of progress toward the elimination of poverty in a
community.
(3) "Low income" means a household income level established by Louisiana
Works, after public hearings and contained within the Community Development
Block Grant State Plan, herein referred to as "state plan", below which an individual
will be qualified for services delivered through a community action program. The
household income level shall not exceed the income eligibility guidelines established
by congress.
Page 4 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(4) "One Door" means a coordinated, customer-centered service delivery
model through which individuals and families may access multiple workforce,
education, and human services programs through a single entry point.
§63. Community action agency; appointment, responsibilities
A. The parish governing authority, by resolution or ordinance, shall
designate a community action agency to administer the applicable provisions of this
Part and such designation shall be on an annual basis. Prior to making such
designation, the parish governing authority shall conduct a public hearing, after
giving public notice of its intention to designate an agency. The public hearing shall
include an evaluation of the administrative and programmatic capabilities of the
agency or agencies under consideration for designation as the community action
agency for the area.
Prior to making such designation, the local governing authority shall consider
the previous accomplishments of the agency or agencies under consideration for
designation and the ability of each to conduct community action programs, including
but not limited to the following service components designed to assist program
participants to: For purposes of this Part, "community action agency" means an
entity which was previously designated on the day before the enactment of the Coats
Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1998 or is designated by the chief executive
officer of this state, pursuant to Section 676A of the Community Services Block
Grant Act and has a tripartite board as described in R.S. 23: 64.1 or other mechanism
as defined by the Community Services Block Grant Act.
B. Louisiana Works shall be the designated lead agency for the purposes of
carrying out state activities as provided for in the Community Services Block Grant
Act. Louisiana Works shall develop a state plan with assurances that funds made
available to community action agencies shall be used to do all of the following:
(1) Secure and retain meaningful employment.
(2) Attain an adequate education.
(3) Make better use of available income.
(4) Secure and maintain adequate housing.
Page 5 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(5) Undertake family planning consistent with personal and family goals, and
religious and moral convictions.
(6) Obtain services for the prevention and treatment of habit forming
chemicals and substances, and for rehabilitation services, where needed.
(7) (5) Obtain emergency assistance through loans or grants to meet
immediate and urgent individual and family needs, including health services,
nutritious foods, housing, employment, and related assistance.
(8) Achieve greater participation in the affairs of the community.
(9) Be informed of and obtain income substitutes.
(10) (6) Make more frequent and effective use of other programs, public and
private, that offer services related to the purpose of this Part.
B. C. As may be determined necessary or at the request of a legislator or
legislative delegation representing a district or districts in which the community
action agency provides services, the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget may
direct Louisiana Works, the appropriate state funding agency, or the legislative fiscal
office to conduct evaluations of community action agencies providing services under
pursuant to the provisions of this Part. Such The evaluations may involve specific
programs or encompass the entire range of activities, including administration, of
any community action agency. Such The evaluations shall be transmitted to the local
governing authority, the appropriate legislative delegation, the department, the
Senate Committee on Local and Municipal Affairs, the House Committee on
Municipal, Parochial and Cultural Affairs, and the Joint Legislative Committee on
the Budget.
C. D. A community action agency shall:
(1) Compile information and data which reflects the needs of low income
individuals in the geographical area served by the agency and identify the extent to
which those needs are unmet by public and private agencies serving the area.
(2) Develop and implement programs and projects designed to serve unmet
needs of individuals with low income and provide for maximum feasible
participation in these programs and projects by eligible individuals.
Page 6 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(3) Establish procedures and adopt rules which enable area residents to
influence the characters of services provided by community action agencies.
(4) Join with and encourage private organizations to undertake activities in
support of the community action program that will result in additional use of private
resources and capabilities in accomplishing the purposes of this Part.
(5) Provide technical assistance to public and private agencies engaged in
activities related to the community action program to enable them to seek out,
secure, and administer public and private funds available for their activities.
(6) Provide other services that are determined by Louisiana Works to be
consistent with the purposes of this Part. The department shall establish these
requirements in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et
seq.
D. E. Each community action agency must prepare and submit annually to
Louisiana Works, the Senate Committee on Local and Municipal Affairs, the House
Committee on Municipal, Parochial and Cultural Affairs, and the Joint Legislative
Committee on the Budget, not later than sixty days prior to the end of the applicable
fiscal year period used by the community action agency, a budget document which
shall present a complete financial plan for the ensuing fiscal year period which has
been approved and adopted by the community action agency's governing board body.
The chief administrative officer of the community action agency shall be responsible
for the preparation of the budget document, which shall include at a minimum the
following:
(1) A budget message signed by the chief administrative officer which shall
present a summary description of the proposed financial plan, policies, and
objectives.
(2) A a detailed and comprehensive breakdown of all programs administered
with CSBG funds, estimates of all grants and funds received, estimates of
expenditures itemized by function and object, administrative costs incurred, and
contractual services secured, all reported for both the current and succeeding fiscal
year grant periods. The budget document shall also include a complete listing of all
Page 7 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
employees and their classifications and salary levels, including any related fringe
benefits and shall be signed by the secretary or his designee.
E. F. Louisiana Works or the appropriate funding agency shall impose, by
rules and regulations, such any requirements and restrictions upon the execution of
community action agency budgets which provide for sound fiscal management,
internal controls, budgetary compliance, and overall fiscal accountability. These
shall, at a minimum, provide for quarterly reporting of actual revenue receipts and
expenditures, new or supplementary grants of funds, and all other deviations from
the original budget submission. The departments shall report to the Senate
Committee on Local and Municipal Affairs, the House Committee on Municipal,
Parochial and Cultural Affairs, and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
instances identified wherein a community action agency's operations have not
complied with the requirements of this Section.
§64.1. Governing Tripartite board
A. Each community action agency or private nonprofit organization shall
administer its programs through a governing board which shall consist of from a
minimum of fifteen to a maximum of thirty-one members who shall be selected by
the community action agency or private nonprofit organization. Agencies that are
serving parishes meeting the definition of rural areas as defined in R.S. 3:313 and
receiving an annual Community Service Block Grant allocation of less than eighty
thousand and one cent may petition Louisiana Works for a downward exception to
the minimum number of board members required. For community action agencies
meeting this distinction, the board shall consist of a minimum of nine to a maximum
of thirty-one members. Boards requesting this exception shall make a written
request to Louisiana Works no less than one hundred eighty days prior to the desired
effective date. Each board will be constituted so as to assure that:
* * *
(2) At least No fewer than one-third of the members of the governing board
shall be individuals with low income who reside in the area to be served by the
agency, or representatives of those individuals. Persons representing individuals
Page 8 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
with low income need not themselves have incomes below the level established by
Louisiana Works for purposes of this Part; however, these representatives must
reside in the same geographic area as the individuals they represent and must be
chosen in accordance with democratic selection procedures adequate to assure that
they are representatives of the poor low income in the area served.
* * *
B. Each local governing authority or public agency designated as a
community action agency shall establish an advisory board, with advisory powers
only, that shall consist of fifteen to thirty-one members which shall be constituted
to assure that both of the following:
(1) At least one-third of the members are persons chosen from the area
served in accordance with democratic selection procedures adequate to assure that
they are representative of the poor low-income individuals and families in the area
served; or.
* * *
§76. Forecasting
* * *
C.
* * *
(4) The principals of the conference shall be as follows:
* * *
(f) Two members, each of whom shall be a faculty member of a public or
private university or college in Louisiana, who shall be econometricians economists
and have occupational forecasting expertise or expertise in economic planning and
industry/occupation industry-occupation matrix formulation, to be selected by the
other five principals of the conference from a list of not less than three nor more than
five nominees submitted by the secretary of Louisiana Board of Regents Works.
* * *
Page 9 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(i) One member selected by the governor from a list of three nominees
submitted by the Louisiana Minority Supplier Development Council Chamber of
Commerce Foundation.
* * *
§382. Apprenticeship council
A. The secretary shall appoint an apprenticeship council, composed of three
representatives each from employer and employee organizations respectively, and
of two representatives of the general public. The three employer representatives shall
be selected from lists supplied by employer organizations which are participating in
bona fide apprenticeship programs. The three employee representatives may be
representatives of labor organizations, who have been nominated by state labor
federations. The state official in charge of trade and industrial education shall, ex
officio, be a member of the council. Each member shall be appointed for a term of
three years. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration
of the term of his predecessor shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. Each
member may appoint a designee to serve in his stead. Each member who desires to
have a designee shall provide written notice to the secretary for approval. The written
notice shall name the individual who shall be the official designee until the member
or the secretary revokes the designation. Designees in a representative capacity may
participate and vote in council meetings. Each member of the council not otherwise
compensated by public monies, shall be reimbursed for transportation and shall be
paid thirty-five dollars per day for each day spent in attendance at meetings of the
apprenticeship council.
B.(1) The apprenticeship council shall meet at the call of the secretary or the
director of apprenticeship and shall aid in formulating policies for the effective
administration of this Chapter. Subject to the approval of the secretary, the
apprenticeship council may shall do all of the following:
(a) recommend Recommend standards and procedures for registration and
de-registration of apprenticeship programs in conformity with established programs
approved by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship. , and
Page 10 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
(b) Recommend, for approval, for approval of apprenticeship agreements
which in no case shall be lower than those prescribed by this Chapter and by the
United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship, or lower than
approved national standards; shall issue such.
(c) Recommend rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the
intent and purposes thereof; and shall.
(d) perform such Perform other functions as the secretary may direct.
(2) Not less than once a year the apprenticeship council shall make a report,
through the secretary, of its activities and findings to the legislature and to the public.
* * *
§384. Powers and duties of director
A. The director, under the supervision of the secretary and with the advice
and guidance of the apprenticeship council, is authorized to administer the provisions
of this Chapter. The director shall, in cooperation with advice from the
apprenticeship council, set up conditions and training standards for apprentice
agreements, which shall in no case be lower than those prescribed by this Chapter
and by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship, or lower
than approved national standards.
* * *
§385. Apprenticeship programs; registration and function
* * *
B. An apprenticeship program shall be registered in any trade occupation or
group of trades occupations in accordance with this Chapter and with the standards
of United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship. An apprenticeship
program shall cooperate with educational authorities in regard to the education of
apprentices; shall establish a schedule of operations; shall establish wage rates and
working conditions for apprentices; shall specify the ratio of apprentices to journey
workers employed in any trade occupation in accordance with this Chapter and the
Page 11 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship; and shall adjust
apprenticeship disputes.
* * *
§390. Settlement of controversies or complaints
* * *
C. Upon the complaint of any interested person or upon his own initiative,
the director of apprenticeship may investigate to determine if there has been a
violation of the terms of an apprenticeship agreement made under pursuant to this
Chapter and hold hearings, inquiries, and other proceedings necessary to such the
investigations and determination. The director of apprenticeship shall investigate
programs only as necessary to establish compliance, and then only upon proper
notice. The parties to such the agreement shall be given a fair and impartial hearing,
after reasonable notice thereof. All hearings, investigations, and determinations shall
be made under authority of reasonable rules and procedure prescribed by the
secretary with advice from the apprenticeship council, subject to the approval of the
secretary.
* * *
§1123. Disputes as to condition or capacity to work; additional medical opinion
regarding an examination under supervision of the secretary
If any dispute arises between two physicians as to the condition of the
employee, or the employee's capacity to work, the assistant secretary, upon
application of any party, shall order an additional medical opinion regarding an
examination of the employee to be made by a medical practitioner selected and
appointed by the assistant secretary. The medical examiner shall report his
conclusions from the examination to the assistant secretary and to the parties and
such the report shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated in any
subsequent proceedings under pursuant to this Chapter.
* * *
Page 12 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
§1178. Cost containment meeting; incentive discount
A. The office shall develop and implement informational cost containment
meetings for all employers, upon request, on the target list compiled pursuant to R.S.
23:1177 that shall, at a minimum:
* * *
B. The office shall inform all eligible employers on the target list of the dates
and locations of the opportunity to schedule cost containment meetings to be held in
areas throughout the state, as determined by the office. The employers shall be
informed that if a designated representative from the company attends the meeting,
the company will be granted a reduction in its experience modifier at the rate
determined in R.S. 23:1179(B).
* * *
E. Procedures to establish proof of attendance of a cost containment meeting
by designated representatives of eligible employers shall be established by rule by
the office. Employers who would otherwise be eligible shall be allowed to requalify
for this reduction only once every four years.
* * *
§1310.3. Initiation of claims; voluntary mediation; procedure
A. A claim for benefits, the controversion of entitlement to benefits, or other
relief under pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act shall be initiated by the
filing of the appropriate form with the office of workers' compensation
administration. Mailing, facsimile transmission, or electronic transmission of the
form and payment of the filing fee within five seven days of any such mailing or
transmission constitutes the initiation of a claim under pursuant to R.S. 23:1209.
* * *
§1372. Louisiana Workers' Compensation Second Injury Board; creation, domicile,
membership
The Louisiana Workers' Compensation Second Injury Board, hereinafter referred to
as the board, is created. The board, which shall be domiciled in Baton Rouge,
Louisiana, shall be composed of five members or their designee, who shall be the
Page 13 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
secretary of state, the state treasurer, the commissioner of insurance, the secretary of
the Louisiana Department of Health Children and Family Services, and the assistant
secretary of the office of workers' compensation administration.
* * *
§1378. Determination of liability of fund
A.
* * *
(2) No employer or insurer shall be entitled to reimbursement unless it is
clearly established that the employer had actual knowledge of the employee's
preexisting permanent partial disability prior to the subsequent injury. For injuries
occurring after December 31, 2010, actual knowledge shall be established only by
any one of the following circumstances:
* * *
(c) The employer employs, retains, or re-employs employees from the an
employee with a PPD employee registry maintained by Louisiana Works and which
is created and maintained in accordance with rules promulgated by the office of
workers' compensation.
* * *
E. Written notice of the decision of the board shall be given to all parties to
the hearing and the representatives designated by the party on the reimbursement
form submitted to the board. The decision of the board shall be final; however, an
appeal therefrom may be taken by any of the parties within thirty days after the date
of the decision of the board. If an appeal is taken, the board shall be made party
defendant, and service and citation shall be made in accordance with applicable law
upon the attorney general or one of his assistants and the assistant secretary of the
office of workers' compensation within Louisiana Works. The appeal shall be to the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court, parish of East Baton Rouge. All appeals in all
such cases shall be tried de novo.
* * *
Page 14 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
§1538. Payroll reports; failure of employer to file; incorrect reports; determination
of rates
A.(1) If the administrator finds that any employer has failed to file any
payroll report or has filed a report which the administrator finds incorrect or
insufficient, the administrator may make an estimate of the information required
from the employer on the basis of the best evidence reasonably available to him at
the time, and notify the employer thereof by registered mail addressed to his last
known address by mail or electronic delivery to the last known address or electronic
contact information on record. Unless the employer files the report or a corrected or
sufficient report, as the case may be, no later than twenty days after the mailing of
the notice date of notification, the administrator may compute such the employer's
rate of contribution on the basis of such the estimates, and the rate so determined
shall be subject to increase or decrease on the basis of subsequently ascertained
information.
* * *
§1541. Notice of benefits charged against employer's experience rating record;
employer's right to contest; application for review; procedure
A. The administrator shall, not later than ninety days after the close of each
calendar quarter, render a statement to each employer of benefits paid each
individual and charged to his experience-rating record. These benefit charges are
conclusive and binding upon the employer unless he files an application to review
the charges setting forth his reasons therefor within thirty days after the mailing of
the notice date the notification is sent to his last known address or electronic contact
information on record.
* * *
E. The administrator shall notify each employer, no later than December
thirty-first of each year, of his rate of contribution for the forthcoming calendar year
as determined for any relevant experience-rating year pursuant to this Part. This
determination shall be conclusive and binding upon an employer unless within thirty
days after the mailing of notice hereof to his last known address date the notification
Page 15 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
is delivered to the employer's last known address or electronic contact information
on record the employer files an application for review and redetermination, setting
forth his reasons therefor. If the administrator grants such the review, the employer
shall be promptly notified thereof and shall be granted an opportunity for a fair
hearing, but no employer shall have standing, in any proceeding involving his rate
of contribution or contribution liability, to contest the chargeability of any benefits
to his experience-rating record as to cases wherein he has previously been notified
and had an opportunity for hearing, review, and appeal. The employer shall be
promptly notified of the administrator's action which shall become final unless,
within thirty days after the mailing of notice thereof date the notification is delivered
to his last known address or electronic contact information on record, a petition for
judicial review is filed in the district court of employer's domicile. In any proceeding
under this provided for in this Subsection, the findings of the administrator as to facts
shall be presumed to be prima facie correct if supported by substantial and competent
evidence. These proceedings shall be heard in a summary manner and shall be given
precedence over all other civil cases except cases arising under pursuant to Part VI
of this Chapter and Chapter 10 of this Title. An appeal may be taken from the
decision of the district court in the same manner, but not inconsistent with the
provisions of this Chapter as in other civil cases.
F.(1) Within thirty days after the mailing date the notification is delivered
to his last known address or electronic contact information on record, the employer
may contribute any amount to his experience-rating account.
* * *
§1541.1. Notice of chargeability of benefits to base-period employers; employer's
right to contest; appeals; procedure
A. The administrator shall issue, upon the commencement of payment of a
claim, a determination of chargeability of benefits to base-period employers. The
determination shall be conclusive and binding upon any such base-period employer
unless he files an appeal, setting forth his reasons within thirty days after the date of
mailing notification of any such determination. Legal holidays and days on which
Page 16 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
the agency is closed shall serve to extend the delay periods. Except as otherwise
provided in this Chapter, an appeal shall be considered timely if the appeal is filed
during the benefit year in which the determination was issued and the failure to file
a timely appeal was the result of an administrative error or a physical inability of the
party filing the appeal. The party filing the appeal shall provide competent evidence
regarding the administrative error or physical inability. Any appeal filed after the
benefit year shall not be considered timely. This Subsection shall not apply if a court
ruling is issued before the appeal is filed.
B. If appealed, then upon being given the opportunity to be heard, the
employer shall be promptly notified of the administrative law judge's action, which
shall be final unless the employer files a petition for judicial review in the state
judicial district court of the employer's domicile within thirty days of the date of
mailing notification of an such action. In any court proceeding under pursuant to this
Subsection, the findings of the administrative law judge as to facts shall be presumed
to be prima facie correct, if supported by substantial and competent evidence. These
proceedings shall be heard in summary manner and shall be given precedence over
all other civil cases, except cases arising under pursuant to Part VI of this Chapter
or Chapter 10 of this Title. An appeal may be further taken from the decision of the
state judicial district court in the same manner, but not inconsistent with the
provisions of this Chapter, as provided in other civil cases.
* * *
§1593. Weekly benefits payable; deduction of earnings
An eligible individual who is employed in any week shall be paid with
respect to such week a benefit equal to his weekly benefit amount less any wages
payable to him with respect to such week in excess of fifty percent of his current
weekly benefit amount, or fifty dollars, whichever is lower. This benefit, if not a
multiple of one dollar, shall be computed to the nearest multiple of one dollar.
* * *
§1595. Duration of benefits
* * *
Page 17 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
B.(1) The maximum number of weekly benefits that a claimant may be
eligible for in a benefit year shall depend on the average of the three most recently
published state seasonally adjusted unemployment rates preceding the month in
which the claimant files his first claim for benefits be determined semi-annually,
based on the average of the three most recently published state seasonally adjusted
unemployment rates available prior to January first and July first of each calendar
year. A claimant filing an initial claim for benefits between January first and June
thirtieth shall be subject to the maximum duration determined based on the average
unemployment rate preceding January first. A claimant filing an initial claim
between July first and December thirty-first shall be subject to the maximum
duration determined based on the average unemployment rate preceding July first.
* * *
C. On a biannual semi-annual basis, Louisiana Works shall publish on its
website the maximum number of weekly benefits that a claimant may be eligible for
in a benefit year, provided for in Subsection B of this Section, for a claimant who has
filed an initial claim for unemployment benefits in any week in that month. This
publication shall occur no later than January first and July first of each calendar year.
* * *
§1599. Waiver of certified mail notification requirement
An employer, his duly authorized representative, or the claimant may waive
the right under pursuant to this Chapter to receive written notices or determinations
by certified mail. The waiver shall be in writing and shall be mailed or transmitted
electronically to the office of unemployment insurance administration within
Louisiana Works in a manner prescribed by the department. If the right to receive
written notices and determinations by certified mail has been waived, written notices
or determinations may be transmitted by first class mail or by electronic delivery.
A notice or determination is deemed delivered when it has been mailed or
electronically transmitted. Delivery of a notice or determination, whether mailed or
electronically transmitted, shall be deemed complete on the date shown on the notice.
Page 18 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
Delivery to the last known address or electronic contact information on record shall
constitute sufficient notice.
* * *
§1601. Disqualification for benefits
An individual shall be disqualified for benefits:
* * *
(8)(a) For the week, or fraction thereof, with respect to which the individual
makes a false statement or representation knowing it to be false, or knowingly fails
to disclose a material fact in obtaining or increasing benefits, whether or not the
individual is successful in obtaining or increasing benefits, or otherwise due to his
fraud receives any amount as benefits under pursuant to this Chapter to which the
individual was not entitled, for the remainder of the benefit year subsequent to the
commission of the fraudulent act and continuing until the benefits so obtained plus
any penalty imposed in accordance with R.S. 23:1714 are repaid, or until ten years
have elapsed from the date of disqualification the claim for repayment has
prescribed, whichever comes first.
(b) All benefits paid with respect to such weeks shall be immediately due
and on demand paid in accordance with department regulations to the administrator
for the fund, and such the individual shall not be entitled to further benefits until
repayment has been made or the claim for repayment has prescribed. If information
indicating that a claimant has earned any unreported wages for weeks claimed is
obtained by the administrator, prior to the administrator rendering a determination
on the issue, the claimant shall be notified by mail or other delivery method,
including electronic delivery. The claimant shall have seven days from the date of
mailing to respond, or if notice is not by mail, then the claimant shall have seven
days from the delivery date of such the notice to respond as directed by the
department.
* * *
Page 19 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
§1624. Monetary determination and notice of claim
An agent designated by the administrator shall take the claim. A
determination of eligibility made on the basis of base period wage credits shall be
made promptly and shall include a statement as to whether benefits are payable, the
week with respect to which benefits shall commence, the weekly benefit amount
payable and the maximum duration of benefits. Within thirty days of the date the
claim was filed, notice of this monetary determination shall be mailed or
electronically delivered to the claimant and, if the claimant is eligible, to the last
employer or employing unit and to all of the base period employers or mailed to their
last known address or electronic contact information on record. For any
determination that begins a statutory period for appeal, protest, or other action,
delivery by mail or electronic transmission shall satisfy the notice requirements.
Delivery, whether mailed or electronically transmitted, shall be deemed complete on
the date shown on the notice. Delivery to the last known address or electronic
contact information on record shall constitute sufficient notice.
* * *
§1625. Notice of determination on claims
If a disqualification is alleged, or appears to exist, notice of the determination
together with the reasons therefor shall be promptly delivered to the claimant and to
the employer from whose employment the disqualification issue arose or mailed to
using their the last known address or electronic contact information on record. For
any determination that begins a statutory period for appeal, protest, or other action,
delivery by mail or electronic transmission shall satisfy the notice requirements.
Delivery, whether mailed or electronically transmitted, shall be deemed complete on
the date shown on the notice. Delivery to the last known address or electronic
contact information on record shall constitute sufficient notice.
* * *
§1626. Redetermination; notice
* * *
Page 20 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
B. The administrator may reconsider a nonmonetary determination whenever
he finds that benefits have been allowed or denied on the basis of misrepresentation
or that an error in interpretation of fact or application of law has occurred or
whenever either of the parties entitled to notice of determination as specified in R.S.
23:1625 protests the decision within fifteen days from the date of the determination.
Legal holidays and days on which the agency is closed shall serve to extend the
delay period. The administrator shall make findings and conclusions and on the
basis thereof affirm, modify, or reverse the determination. Notice of such the
redetermination shall be promptly given to the parties specified in R.S. 23:1625. If
the administrator finds that the evidence at hand does not justify redetermination of
a protested determination, he may, upon notification of the parties specified in R.S.
23:1625, transfer the protest, without further determination, to the appeal referee for
appeal proceedings. In the event that an appeal involving an original determination
is pending at the time a redetermination is issued, the appeal, unless withdrawn, shall
be treated as an appeal from the redetermination.
C. Furthermore, the administrator shall reconsider a final determination or
decision to pay benefits whenever he finds that such the determination or decision
may have been improper based upon a subsequent event relative to the claimant's
separation from employment, including a conviction or an admission of guilt or
complicity to avoid or minimize judicial penalty which would indicate that the award
of benefits may have been improper. The administrator shall promptly issue a notice
of such the redetermination as provided by R.S. 23:1625. Legal holidays and days
on which the department is closed shall serve to extend the delay periods. The
administrator shall make findings and conclusions and on the basis thereof affirm,
modify, or reverse the determination or decision. Any party to such the
redetermination may file an appeal therefrom pursuant to R.S. 23:1629. Should a
redetermination denying the award of benefits become final, such the benefits
improperly paid shall be recoverable as provided by R.S. 23:1713. Any such
redetermination shall be made within five years of the original award.
Page 21 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
§1627. Determination in labor dispute cases
Whenever any claim involves the application of the provisions of R.S.
23:1601(4) the individual handling the claim shall, if so directed by the
administrator, promptly transmit all the evidence with respect to such the case to the
administrator. The administrator or the representatives he may designate shall, on
the basis of the evidence submitted and such the additional evidence as he may
require, make a determination with respect thereto. Such The determination shall be
the final decision on the claim, unless within fifteen days after the date notification
was given or was mailed or electronically delivered to a party's last known address
or electronic contact information on record, an appeal is filed with an appeal referee.
* * *
§1629. Appeals to appeal referee; time for filing; notice of hearing and decision
A.(1) Within fifteen days after the date of notification of a determination was
given or was mailed to his last known address, the claimant or any other party
entitled to notice of a determination may file an appeal from such determination with
an appeal referee either by mailing such appeal, as evidenced by the postmarked
date, or by delivering such appeal by mail or other methods prescribed by the
department. Legal holidays and days on which the department is closed shall serve
to extend the delay periods. The appeal referee shall mail provide a "notice to appear
for a hearing" to all parties to the appeal at least seven days prior to the date of
hearing,. The notice shall be sent by mail unless the party has consented to
electronic delivery. and copies Copies of the statements by the claimant and
employer, which were used in the appealed determination, shall be sent with such
notice if requested to the parties if the request is received at least two business days
prior to the scheduled hearing.
(2)(a) A party to an appeal may expressly waive the seven-day advance
notice requirement by written waiver executed after the appeal has been filed.
(b) A copy of the written waiver shall be included in the record.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to dispense with the
requirement that a "notice to appear for hearing" be mailed prevent the department
Page 22 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
from providing a notice to appear for a hearing by mail, or with the party's consent,
by electronic delivery.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, an appeal shall be
considered timely if the appeal is filed during the benefit year in which the
determination was issued and the failure to file a timely appeal was the result of an
administrative error or a physical inability of the party filing the appeal. The party
filing the appeal shall provide competent evidence regarding the administrative error
or physical inability. Any appeal filed after the benefit year shall not be considered
timely. This Paragraph shall not apply if a court ruling is issued before the appeal
is filed.
* * *
§1630. Review of decision by board of review; notice of board's decision
A. The board of review may on its own motion, within fifteen days after the
date of notification or of mailing of a decision of an appeal referee, initiate a review
of such the decision. The board of review may otherwise allow an appeal from such
decision to be filed, any party entitled to notice of a decision to file an appeal by mail
or any other methods prescribed by the department within fifteen days after the date
of notification or of mailing of a decision of an appeal referee, by any party entitled
to notice of such decision, if such appeal is either mailed, as evidenced by the
postmarked date, or is delivered by any such party. An appeal filed by any such
party shall be allowed as of right if such the decision was not unanimous, or if the
determination was not affirmed by the appeal referee. Legal holidays and days on
which the agency is closed shall serve to extend the delay periods. Upon review on
its own motion or upon appeal, the board of review may, on the basis of the evidence
previously submitted in such the case, or upon the basis of such any additional
evidence as it may direct be taken, affirm, modify, or reverse the findings and
conclusions of the appeal referee. The board of review may remove to itself or
transfer to another appeal referee the proceedings on any claims pending before an
appeal referee. Any proceedings so removed to the board of review prior to the
completion of a fair hearing shall be heard by the board of review in accordance with
Page 23 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
the requirements of this Chapter with respect to proceedings before an appeal
referee.
B. The board of review shall make a determination and notify all parties of
its decision, including its findings and conclusions in support thereof, within sixty
days from the date an appeal is received or initiated by the board. Notices shall be
mailed to the party's last known address unless the party has consented to electronic
delivery, in which case the notice may be transmitted electronically to the contact
information on record. Should the board of review, within sixty days from the date
an appeal is received or initiated, direct that additional evidence be taken, the board
of review shall make a determination and notify all parties of its decision, including
its findings and conclusions in support thereof, within sixty days from the date it
receives the additional evidence. Such The decision shall be final unless, within
fifteen days after the mailing of notice thereof the date of notification of the board's
decision to the party's last known address, or, in the absence of such mailing, within
fifteen days after the delivery of such notice or electronic contact information on
record, a proceeding for judicial review is initiated pursuant to R.S. 23:1634. Upon
denial by the board of review of an application for appeal from the decision of an
appeal referee, the decision of the appeal referee shall be deemed to be a decision of
the board of review within the meaning of this Section for purposes of judicial
review and shall be subject to judicial review within the time and in the manner
provided for with respect to decision of the board of review, except that the time for
initiating such a review shall run from the date of notice of the order of the board of
review denying the application for appeal.
C. Except as otherwise provided for in this Chapter, an appeal shall be
considered timely if the appeal is filed during the benefit year in which the
determination was issued and the failure to file a timely appeal was the result of an
administrative error or a physical inability of the party filing the appeal. The party
filing the appeal shall provide competent evidence regarding the administrative error
or physical inability. Any appeal filed after the benefit year shall not be considered
Page 24 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
timely. This Subsection shall not apply if a court ruling is issued before the appeal
is filed.
* * *
§1714. Penalties
A. A civil penalty shall be assessed if benefits are determined to have been
overpaid as a result of a fraud disqualification made pursuant to R.S. 23:1601(8) in
the amount of twenty dollars or twenty-five percent, whichever is greater, fifty
percent of the total overpayment amount. Except as otherwise provided in
Subsection C of this Section and any provisions of law in this state relating to the
deposit, administration, release, or disbursement of money in the possession or
custody of this state to the contrary notwithstanding, fifteen percent of each such
overpayment amount recovered shall be deposited with the Secretary of the Treasury
of the United States of America to the credit of the account of this state in the
Unemployment Trust Fund established and maintained pursuant to 42 U.S.C.A.
§1101, et seq., as amended, and ten percent of each such overpayment amount
recovered shall be deposited in the penalty and interest account established by R.S.
23:1513 and used to offset collection expenses.
* * *
§1749.2. Notice of overpayment delinquency; suspension of license
A. The commission Louisiana Works may send by certified mail, return
receipt requested, a notice of overpayment delinquency to an obligor informing the
obligor of the commission's department's intention to submit his name to the
licensing authority for suspension of his license. If an obligor holds multiple
licenses, the commission department may issue a single notice of its intention to
submit multiple suspensions.
* * *
§2051. Designees
A. Each council member may appoint a designee to serve in his stead. Each
council member who desires to have a designee shall provide written notice of such
to the chairman of the council for approval by the chairman. Such The written notice
Page 25 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 923 ENROLLED
shall name the individual who shall be the official designee until the council member
or the chairman revokes such the designation. No council member shall be
represented in a meeting other than by the official designee.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 36:301(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted as follows:
§301. Louisiana Works; creation; domicile; composition; purposes and functions
* * *
C.(1) Louisiana Works shall be composed of the executive office of the
secretary, the office of management and finance, the office of workforce
development, the office of unemployment insurance administration, the office of
workers' compensation administration, and such any other offices as shall be created
by law. The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council, as more specifically provided
in R.S. 23:2042 et seq., shall be placed within the executive office of the secretary
office of management and finance under the purview of the secretary.
* * *
Section 3. Part II of Chapter 1 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:41 through 49, 1178(D), 1226(C)(2), and 1601(10)(b) are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 26 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.